District of Columbia statutes.
11-1904

Jury system plan.

(a)

The Board of Judges shall adopt, implement, and as necessary modify, a written jury system plan for the random selection and service of grand and petit jurors in the Superior Court consistent with the provisions of this chapter. The adopted plan and any modifications shall be subject to a 30-day period of review by Congress in the manner provided for an act of the Council under section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act. The plan shall include —

(1)

detailed procedures to be followed by the clerk of the Court in the random selection of names from the master juror list;

(2)

provisions for a master jury wheel (or other device of like purpose and function) which shall be emptied and refilled at specified intervals, not to exceed 24 months;

(3)

provisions for the disclosure to the parties and the public of the names of individuals selected for jury service, except in cases in which the chief judge determines that confidentiality is required in the interest of justice; and

(4)

procedures to be followed by the clerk of the Court in assigning individuals to grand and petit juries.

(b)

The jury system plan shall be administered by the clerk of the Court under the supervision of the Board of Judges.

Nov. 14, 1986, 100 Stat. 3635, Pub. L. 99-650, § 2
1981 Ed., § 11-1904.
Short title: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 11-1901.
Section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, referred to in subsection (a), is codified as § 1-206.02.